Hawaii statutes.
TITLE 27.
UNIFORM COMMERCIAL CODE

Chapter

490 Uniform Commercial Code

CHAPTER
490

UNIFORM
COMMERCIAL CODE

ARTICLE 1.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Part 1. General Provisions

Section

490:1-101 Short title

490:1-102 Scope of article

490:1-103 Construction of chapter to promote its
purposes and

policies; applicability of supplemental
principles

of law

490:1-104 Construction against implied repeal

490:1-105 Severability

490:1-106 Use of singular and plural; gender

490:1-107 Section captions

490:1-108 Relation to Electronic Signatures in
Global and

National Commerce Act

Part 2. General Definitions and Principles
of

Interpretation

490:1-201 General definitions

490:1-202 Notice; knowledge

490:1-203 Lease distinguished from security
interest

490:1-204 Value

490:1-205 Reasonable time; seasonableness

490:1-206 Presumptions

Part 3. Territorial Applicability and
General Rules

490:1-301 Territorial applicability; parties'
power to choose

applicable law

490:1-302 Variation by agreement

490:1-303 Course of performance, course of
dealing, and usage

of trade

490:1-304 Obligation of good faith

490:1-305 Remedies to be liberally administered

490:1-306 Waiver or renunciation of claim or
right after

breach

490:1-307 Prima facie evidence by third-party
documents

490:1-308 Performance or acceptance under
reservation of

rights

490:1-309 Option to accelerate at will

490:1-310 Subordinated obligations

ARTICLE 2.
SALES

Part 1. Short Title, General Construction
and

Subject Matter

490:2-101 Short title

490:2-102 Scope; certain security and other transactions

excluded from this article

490:2-103 Definitions and index of definitions

490:2-104 Definitions: "merchant";
"between merchants";

"financing agency"

490:2-105 Definitions: transferability;
"goods"; "future"

goods; "lot";
"commercial unit"

490:2-106 Definitions: "contract";
"agreement"; "contract

for sale"; "sale";
"present sale"; "conforming" to

contract; "termination";
"cancellation"

490:2-107 Goods to be severed from realty:
recording

Part 2. Form, Formation and Readjustment
of Contract

490:2-201 Formal requirements; statute of frauds

490:2-202 Final written expression: parol or
extrinsic

evidence

490:2-203 Seals inoperative

490:2-204 Formation in general

490:2-205 Firm offers

490:2-206 Offer and acceptance in formation of
contract

490:2-207 Additional terms in acceptance or
confirmation

490:2-208 Repealed

490:2-209 Modification, rescission and waiver

490:2-210 Delegation of performance; assignment
of rights

Part 3. General Obligation and
Construction of

Contract

490:2-301 General obligation of parties

490:2-302 Unconscionable contract or clause

490:2-303 Allocation or division of risks

490:2-304 Price payable in money, goods, realty
or otherwise

490:2-305 Open price term

490:2-306 Output, requirements and exclusive
dealings

490:2-307 Delivery in single lot or several lots

490:2-308 Absence of specified place for delivery

490:2-309 Absence of specific time provisions;
notice of

termination

490:2-310 Open time for payment or running of
credit;

authority to ship under reservation

490:2-311 Options and cooperation respecting performance

490:2-312 Warranty of title and against
infringement; buyer's

obligation against infringement

490:2-313 Express warranties by affirmation,
promise,

description, sample

490:2-313.1, 313.2 Repealed

490:2-314 Implied warranty: merchantability;
usage of trade

490:2-315 Implied warranty: fitness for
particular purpose

490:2-316 Exclusion or modification of warranties

490:2-317 Cumulation and conflict of warranties
express or

implied

490:2-318 Third party beneficiaries of warranties
express or

implied

490:2-319 F.O.B. and F.A.S. terms

490:2-320 C.I.F. and C. & F. terms

490:2-321 C.I.F. or C. & F.: "net
landed weights"; "payment

on arrival"; warranty of condition
on arrival

490:2-322 Delivery "ex-ship"

490:2-323 Form of bill of lading required in
overseas

shipment; "overseas"

490:2-324 "No arrival, no sale" term

490:2-325 "Letter of credit" term;
"confirmed credit"

490:2-326 Sale on approval and sale or return;

rights of creditors

490:2-327 Special incidents of sale on approval
and

sale or return

490:2-328 Sale by auction

Part 4. Title, Creditors and Good Faith
Purchasers

490:2-401 Passing of title; reservation for
security; limited

application of this section

490:2-402 Rights of seller's creditors against
sold goods

490:2-403 Power to transfer; good faith purchase
of goods;

"entrusting"

Part 5. Performance

490:2-501 Insurable interest in goods; manner of

identification of goods

490:2-502 Buyer's right to goods on seller's
repudiation,

failure to deliver, or insolvency

490:2-503 Manner of seller's tender of delivery

490:2-504 Shipment by seller

490:2-505 Seller's shipment under reservation

490:2-506 Rights of financing agency

490:2-507 Effect of seller's tender; delivery on
condition

490:2-508 Cure by seller of improper tender or
delivery;

replacement

490:2-509 Risk of loss in the absence of breach

490:2-510 Effect of breach on risk of loss

490:2-511 Tender of payment by buyer; payment by
check

490:2-512 Payment by buyer before inspection

490:2-513 Buyer's right to inspection of goods

490:2-514 When documents deliverable on
acceptance; when on

payment

490:2-515 Preserving evidence of goods in dispute

Part 6. Breach, Repudiation and Excuse

490:2-601 Buyer's rights on improper delivery

490:2-602 Manner and effect of rightful rejection

490:2-603 Merchant buyer's duties as to
rightfully rejected

goods

490:2-604 Buyer's options as to salvage of
rightfully

rejected goods

490:2-605 Waiver of buyer's objections by failure
to

particularize

490:2-606 What constitutes acceptance of goods

490:2-607 Effect of acceptance; notice of breach;
burden of

establishing breach after acceptance;
notice of

claim or litigation to person answerable
over

490:2-608 Revocation of acceptance in whole or in
part

490:2-609 Right to adequate assurance of
performance

490:2-610 Anticipatory repudiation

490:2-611 Retraction of anticipatory repudiation

490:2-612 "Installment contract"; breach

490:2-613 Casualty to identified goods

490:2-614 Substituted performance

490:2-615 Excuse by failure of presupposed
conditions

490:2-616 Procedure on notice claiming excuse

Part 7. Remedies

490:2-701 Remedies for breach of collateral
contracts not

impaired

490:2-702 Seller's remedies on discovery of
buyer's

insolvency

490:2-703 Seller's remedies in general

490:2-704 Seller's right to identify goods to the
contract

notwithstanding breach or to salvage
unfinished

goods

490:2-705 Seller's stoppage of delivery in
transit or

otherwise

490:2-706 Seller's resale including contract for
resale

490:2-707 "Person in the position of a
seller"

490:2-708 Seller's damages for nonacceptance or
repudiation

490:2-709 Action for the price

490:2-710 Seller's incidental damages

490:2-711 Buyer's remedies in general; buyer's
security

interest in rejected goods

490:2-712 "Cover"; buyer's procurement
of substitute goods

490:2-713 Buyer's damages for nondelivery or
repudiation

490:2-714 Buyer's damages for breach in regard to
accepted

goods

490:2-715 Buyer's incidental and consequential
damages

490:2-716 Buyer's right to specific performance
or replevin

490:2-717 Deduction of damages from the price

490:2-718 Liquidation or limitation of damages;
deposits

490:2-719 Contractual modification or limitation
of remedy

490:2-720 Effect of "cancellation" or
"rescission" on claims

for antecedent breach

490:2-721 Remedies for fraud

490:2-722 Who can sue third parties for injury to
goods

490:2-723 Proof of market price; time and place

490:2-724 Admissibility of market quotations

490:2-725 Statute of limitations in contracts for
sale

ARTICLE 2A.
LEASES

Part 1. General Provisions

490:2A-101 Short title

490:2A-102 Scope

490:2A-103 Definitions and index of definitions

490:2A-104 Leases subject to other law

490:2A-105 Territorial application of article to
goods covered

by certificate of title

490:2A-106 Limitation on power of parties to
consumer lease to

choose applicable law and judicial
forum

490:2A-107 Waiver or renunciation of claim or
right after

default

490:2A-108 Unconscionability

490:2A-109 Option to accelerate at will

Part 2. Formation and Construction of
Lease Contract

490:2A-201 Statute of frauds

490:2A-202 Final written expression: parol or
extrinsic

evidence

490:2A-203 Seals inoperative

490:2A-204 Formation in general

490:2A-205 Firm offers

490:2A-206 Offer and acceptance in formation of
lease contract

490:2A-207 Repealed

490:2A-208 Modification, rescission and waiver

490:2A-209 Lessee under finance lease as
beneficiary of supply

contract

409:2A-210 Express warranties

490:2A-211 Warranties against interference and
against

infringement; lessee's obligation
against

infringement

490:2A-212 Implied warranty of merchantability

490:2A-213 Implied warranty of fitness for
particular purpose

490:2A-214 Exclusion or modification of warranties

490:2A-215 Cumulation and conflict of warranties
express or

implied

490:2A-216 Third-party beneficiaries of express
and implied

warranties

490:2A-217 Identification

490:2A-218 Insurance and proceeds

490:2A-219 Risk of loss

490:2A-220 Effect of default on risk of loss

490:2A-221 Casualty to identified goods

Part 3. Effect of Lease Contract

490:2A-301 Enforceability of lease contract

490:2A-302 Title to and possession of goods

490:2A-303 Alienability of party's interest under
lease

contract or of lessor's residual
interest in goods;

delegation of performance; transfer of
rights

490:2A-304 Subsequent lease of goods by lessor

490:2A-305 Sale or sublease of goods by lessee

490:2A-306 Priority of certain liens arising by
operation of

law

490:2A-307 Priority of liens arising by attachment
or levy on,

security interests in, and other claims
to goods

490:2A-308 Special rights of creditors

490:2A-309 Lessor's and lessee's rights when goods
become

fixtures

490:2A-310 Lessor's and lessee's rights when goods
become

accessions

490:2A-311 Priority subject to subordination

Part 4. Performance of Lease Contract:
Repudiated,

Substituted, and Excused

490:2A-401 Insecurity: adequate assurance of performance

490:2A-402 Anticipatory repudiation

490:2A-403 Retraction of anticipatory repudiation

490:2A-404 Substituted performance

490:2A-405 Excused performance

490:2A-406 Procedure on excused performance

490:2A-407 Irrevocable promises: finance leases

Part 5. Default

Subpart A. In General

490:2A-501 Default: procedure

490:2A-502 Notice after default

490:2A-503 Modification or impairment of rights
and remedies

490:2A-504 Liquidation of damages

490:2A-505 Cancellation and termination and effect
of

cancellation, termination, rescission,
or fraud on

rights and remedies

490:2A-506 Statute of limitations

490:2A-507 Proof of market rent: time and place

Subpart B. Default by Lessor

490:2A-508 Lessee's remedies

490:2A-509 Lessee's rights on improper delivery;
rightful

. rejection

490:2A-510 Installment lease contracts: rejection
and default

490:2A-511 Merchant lessee's duties as to
rightfully rejected

goods

490:2A-512 Lessee's duties as to rightfully
rejected goods

490:2A-513 Cure by lessor of improper tender or
delivery;

replacement

490:2A-514 Waiver of lessee's objections

490:2A-515 Acceptance of goods

490:2A-516 Effect of acceptance of goods; notice
of default;

burden of establishing default after
acceptance;

notice of claim or litigation to person
answerable

over

490:2A-517 Revocation of acceptance of goods

490:2A-518 Cover; substitute goods

490:2A-519 Lessee's damages for nondelivery,
repudiation,

default, and breach of warranty in
regard to

accepted goods

490:2A-520 Lessee's incidental and consequential
damages

490:2A-521 Lessee's right to specific performance
or replevin

490:2A-522 Lessee's right to goods on lessor's
insolvency

Subpart C. Default by Lessee

490:2A-523 Lessor's remedies

490:2A-524 Lessor's right to identify goods to
lease contract

490:2A-525 Lessor's right to possession of goods

490:2A-526 Lessor's stoppage of delivery in
transit or

otherwise

490:2A-527 Lessor's rights to dispose of goods

490:2A-528 Lessor's damages for nonacceptance,
failure to pay,

repudiation, or other default

490:2A-529 Lessor's action for the rent

490:2A-530 Lessor's incidental damages

490:2A-531 Standing to sue third parties for
injury to goods

490:2A-532 Lessor's rights to residual interest

ARTICLE 3.
NEGOTIABLE INSTRUMENTS

Part 1. General Provisions and Definitions

490:3-101 Short title

490:3-102 Subject matter

490:3-103 Definitions

490:3-104 Negotiable instrument

490:3-105 Issue of instrument

490:3-106 Unconditional promise or order

490:3-107 Instrument payable in foreign money

490:3-108 Payable on demand or at definite time

490:3-109 Payable to bearer or to order

490:3-110 Identification of person to whom
instrument is

payable

490:3-111 Place of payment

490:3-112 Interest

490:3-113 Date of instrument

490:3-114 Contradictory terms of instrument

490:3-115 Incomplete instrument

490:3-116 Joint and several liability;
contribution

490:3-117 Other agreements affecting instrument

490:3-118 Statute of limitations

490:3-119 Notice of right to defend action

Part 2. Negotiation, Transfer, and
Indorsement

490:3-201 Negotiation

490:3-202 Negotiation subject to rescission

490:3-203 Transfer of instrument; rights acquired
by transfer

490:3-204 Indorsement

490:3-205 Special indorsement; blank indorsement;
anomalous

indorsement

490:3-206 Restrictive indorsement

490:3-207 Reacquisition

Part 3. Enforcement of Instruments

490:3-301 Person entitled to enforce instrument

490:3-302 Holder in due course

490:3-303 Value and consideration

490:3-304 Overdue instrument

490:3-305 Defenses and claims in recoupment

490:3-306 Claims to an instrument

490:3-307 Notice of breach of fiduciary duty

490:3-308 Proof of signatures and status as
holder in due

course

490:3-309 Enforcement of lost, destroyed, or
stolen

instrument

490:3-310 Effect of instrument on obligation for
which taken

490:3-311 Accord and satisfaction by use of
instrument

490:3-312 Lost, destroyed, or stolen cashier's
check,

teller's check, or certified check

Part 4. Liability of Parties

490:3-401 Signature

490:3-402 Signature by representative

490:3-403 Unauthorized signature

490:3-404 Impostors; fictitious payees

490:3-405 Employer responsibility for fraudulent
indorsement

by employee

490:3-406 Negligence contributing to forged
signature or

alteration of instrument

490:3-407 Alteration

490:3-408 Drawee not liable on unaccepted draft

490:3-409 Acceptance of draft; certified check

490:3-410 Acceptance varying draft

490:3-411 Refusal to pay cashier's checks,
teller's checks,

and certified checks

490:3-412 Obligation of issuer of note or
cashier's check

490:3-413 Obligation of acceptor

490:3-414 Obligation of drawer

490:3-415 Obligation of indorser

490:3-416 Transfer warranties

490:3-417 Presentment warranties

490:3-418 Payment or acceptance by mistake

490:3-419 Instruments signed for accommodation

490:3-420 Conversion of instrument

Part 5. Dishonor

490:3-501 Presentment

490:3-502 Dishonor

490:3-503 Notice of dishonor

490:3-504 Excused presentment and notice of
dishonor

490:3-505 Evidence of dishonor

490:3-506 Dishonored check; action for treble
damages;

procedures

490:3-506.5 Charges for dishonored checks

Part 6. Discharge and Payment

490:3-601 Discharge and effect of discharge

490:3-602 Payment

490:3-603 Tender of payment

490:3-604 Discharge by cancellation or
renunciation

490:3-605 Discharge of indorsers and
accommodation parties

ARTICLE 4.
BANK DEPOSITS AND COLLECTIONS

Part 1. General Provisions and Definitions

490:4-101 Short title

490:4-102 Applicability

490:4-103 Variation by agreement; measure of
damages; action

constituting ordinary care

490:4-104 Definitions and index of definitions

490:4-105 "Bank"; "depositary
bank"; "payor bank";

"intermediary bank";
"collecting bank"; "presenting

bank"

490:4-106 Payable through or payable at bank;
collecting bank

490:4-107 Separate office of a bank

490:4-108 Time of receipt of items

490:4-109 Delays

490:4-110 Electronic presentment

490:4-111 Statute of limitations

Part 2. Collection of Items: Depositary
and

Collecting Banks

490:4-201 Status of collecting bank as agent and
provisional

status of credits; applicability of article;
item

indorsed "pay any bank"

490:4-202 Responsibility for collection or
return; when

action timely

490:4-203 Effect of instructions

490:4-204 Methods of sending and presenting;
sending directly

to payor bank

490:4-205 Depositary bank holder of unindorsed
item

490:4-206 Transfer between banks

490:4-207 Transfer warranties

490:4-208 Presentment warranties

490:4-209 Encoding and retention warranties

490:4-210 Security interest of collecting bank in
items,

accompanying documents and proceeds

490:4-211 When bank gives value for purposes of
holder in due

course

490:4-212 Presentment by notice of item not
payable by,

through, or at a bank; liability of
drawer or

indorser

490:4-213 Medium and time of settlement by bank

490:4-214 Right of charge back or refund;
liability of

collecting bank; return of item

490:4-215 Final payment of item by payor bank;
when

provisional debits and credits become
final; when

certain credits become available for
withdrawal

490:4-216 Insolvency and preference

Part 3. Collection of Items; Payor Banks

490:4-301 Deferred posting; recovery of payment
by return of

items; time of dishonor; return of
items by payor

bank

490:4-302 Payor bank's responsibility for late
return of item

490:4-303 When items subject to notice,
stop-payment order,

legal process, or setoff; order in
which items may

be charged or certified

Part 4. Relationship Between Payor Bank
and its

Customer

490:4-401 When bank may charge customer's account

490:4-402 Bank's liability to customer for wrongful
dishonor;

time of determining insufficiency of
account

490:4-403 Customer's right to stop payment;
burden of proof

of loss

490:4-404 Bank not obligated to pay check more
than six

months old

490:4-405 Death or incompetence of customer

490:4-406 Customer's duty to discover and report
unauthorized

signature or alteration

490:4-407 Payor bank's right to subrogation on
improper

payment

Part 5. Collection of Documentary Drafts

490:4-501 Handling of documentary drafts; duty to
send for

presentment and to notify customer of
dishonor

490:4-502 Presentment of "on arrival"
drafts

490:4-503 Responsibility of presenting bank for
documents and

goods; report of reasons for dishonor;
referee in

case of need

490:4-504 Privilege of presenting bank to deal
with goods;

security interest for expenses

ARTICLE 4A.
FUNDS TRANSFERS

Part 1. Subject Matter and Definitions

490:4A-101 Short title

490:4A-102 Subject matter

490:4A-103 Payment order-definitions

490:4A-104 Funds transfer-definitions

490:4A-105 Other definitions

490:4A-106 Time payment order is received

490:4A-107 Federal reserve regulations and
operating circulars

490:4A-108 Relationship to Electronic Fund
Transfer Act

Part 2. Issue and Acceptance of Payment
Order

490:4A-201 Security procedure

490:4A-202 Authorized and verified payment orders

490:4A-203 Unenforceability of certain verified
payment orders

490:4A-204 Refund of payment and duty of customer
to report

with respect to unauthorized payment
order

490:4A-205 Erroneous payment orders

490:4A-206 Transmission of payment order through

funds-transfer or other communication
system

490:4A-207 Misdescription of beneficiary

490:4A-208 Misdescription of intermediary bank or

beneficiary's bank

490:4A-209 Acceptance of payment order

490:4A-210 Rejection of payment order

490:4A-211 Cancellation and amendment of payment
order

490:4A-212 Liability and duty of receiving bank
regarding

unaccepted payment order

Part 3. Execution of Sender's Payment
Order by

Receiving Bank

490:4A-301 Execution and execution date

490:4A-302 Obligations of receiving bank in
execution of

payment order

490:4A-303 Erroneous execution of payment order

490:4A-304 Duty of sender to report erroneously
executed

payment order

490:4A-305 Liability for late or improper
execution or failure

to execute payment order

Part 4. Payment

490:4A-401 Payment date

490:4A-402 Obligation of sender to pay receiving
bank

490:4A-403 Payment by sender to receiving bank

490:4A-404 Obligation of beneficiary's bank to pay
and give

notice to beneficiary

490:4A-405 Payment by beneficiary's bank to
beneficiary

490:4A-406 Payment by originator to beneficiary;
discharge of

underlying obligation

Part 5. Miscellaneous Provisions

490:4A-501 Variation by agreement and effect of
funds-transfer

system rule

490:4A-502 Creditor process served on receiving
bank; setoff

by beneficiary's bank

490:4A-503 Injunction or restraining order with
respect to

funds transfer

490:4A-504 Order in which items and payment orders
may be

charged to account; order of
withdrawals from

account

490:4A-505 Preclusion of objection to debit of
customer's

account

490:4A-506 Rate of interest

490:4A-507 Choice of law

ARTICLE 5.
LETTERS OF CREDIT

490:5-101 Short title

490:5-102 Definitions

490:5-103 Scope

490:5-104 Formal requirements

490:5-105 Consideration

490:5-106 Issuance, amendment, cancellation, and
duration

490:5-107 Confirmer, nominated person, and
advisor

490:5-108 Issuer's rights and obligations

490:5-109 Fraud and forgery

490:5-110 Warranties

490:5-111 Remedies

490:5-112 Transfer of letter of credit

490:5-113 Transfer by operation of law

490:5-114 Assignment of proceeds

490:5-115 Statute of limitations

490:5-116 Choice of law and forum

490:5-117 Subrogation of issuer, applicant, and

nominated person

490:5-118 Security interest of issuer or
nominated

person

ARTICLE 6.
BULK SALES--REPEALED

490:6-101 to 110 Repealed

ARTICLE 7.
DOCUMENTS OF TITLE

Part 1. General

490:7-101 Short title

490:7-102 Definitions and index of definitions

490:7-103 Relation of article to treaty or
statute

490:7-104 Negotiable and nonnegotiable document
of title

490:7-105 Reissuance in alternative medium

490:7-106 Control of electronic document of title

Part 2. Warehouse Receipts: Special
Provisions

490:7-201 Person that may issue a warehouse
receipt; storage

under bond

490:7-202 Form of warehouse receipt; effect of
omission

490:7-203 Liability for nonreceipt or
misdescription

490:7-204 Duty of care; contractual limitation of
warehouse's

liability

490:7-205 Title under warehouse receipt defeated
in certain

cases

490:7-206 Termination of storage at warehouse's
option

490:7-207 Goods must be kept separate; fungible
goods

490:7-208 Altered warehouse receipts

490:7-209 Lien of warehouse

490:7-210 Enforcement of warehouse's lien

Part 3. Bills of Lading: Special
Provisions

490:7-301 Liability for nonreceipt or
misdescription; "said to

contain"; "shipper's weight,
load, and count";

improper handling

490:7-302 Through bills of lading and similar
documents of

title

490:7-303 Diversion; reconsignment; change of
instructions

490:7-304 Tangible bills of lading in a set

490:7-305 Destination bills

490:7-306 Altered bills of lading

490:7-307 Lien of carrier

490:7-308 Enforcement of carrier's lien

490:7-309 Duty of care; contractual limitation of
carrier's

liability

Part 4. Warehouse Receipts and Bills of
Lading:

General Obligations

490:7-401 Irregularities in issue of receipt or
bill or

conduct of issuer

490:7-402 Duplicate document of title; overissue

490:7-403 Obligation of bailee to deliver; excuse

490:7-404 No liability for good-faith delivery
pursuant to

document of title

Part 5. Warehouse Receipts and Bills of
Lading:

Negotiation and Transfer

490-7:501 Form of negotiation and requirements of
due

negotiation

490:7-502 Rights acquired by due negotiation

490:7-503 Document of title to goods defeated in
certain cases

490:7-504 Rights acquired in absence of due
negotiation;

effect of diversion; stoppage of
delivery

490:7-505 Indorser not guarantor for other
parties

490:7-506 Delivery without indorsement: right to
compel

indorsement

490:7-507 Warranties on negotiation or delivery
of document of

title

490:7-508 Warranties of collecting bank as to
documents of

title

490:7-509 Adequate compliance with commercial
contract

Part 6. Warehouse Receipts and Bills of
Lading:

Miscellaneous Provisions

490:7-601 Lost, stolen, or destroyed documents of
title

490:7-602 Judicial process against goods covered
by negotiable

document of title

490:7-603 Conflicting claims; interpleader

Part 7. Miscellaneous Provisions

490:7-701 Applicability

490:7-702 Savings clause

ARTICLE 8.
INVESTMENT SECURITIES

Part 1. Short Title and General Matters

490:8-101 Short title

490:8-102 Definitions

490:8-103 Rules for determining whether certain
obligations

and interests are securities or
financial assets

490:8-104 Acquisition of security or financial
asset or

interest therein

490:8-105 Notice of adverse claim

490:8-106 Control

490:8-107 Whether indorsement, instruction, or
entitlement

order is effective

490:8-108 Warranties in direct holding

490:8-109 Warranties in indirect holding

490:8-110 Applicability; choice of law

490:8-111 Clearing corporation rules

490:8-112 Creditor's legal process

490:8-113 Statute of frauds inapplicable

490:8-114 Evidentiary rules concerning
certificated securities

490:8-115 Securities intermediary and others not
liable to

adverse claimant

490:8-116 Securities intermediary as purchaser for
value

Part 2. Issue and Issuer

490:8-201 Issuer

490:8-202 Issuer's responsibility and defenses;
notice of

defect or defense

490:8-203 Staleness as notice of defect or defense

490:8-204 Effect of issuer's restriction on
transfer

490:8-205 Effect of unauthorized signature on
security

certificate

490:8-206 Completion or alteration of security
certificate

490:8-207 Rights and duties of issuer with respect
to

registered owners

490:8-208 Effect of signature of authenticating
trustee,

registrar, or transfer agent

490:8-209 Issuer's lien

490:8-210 Overissue

Part 3. Transfer of Certificated and
Uncertificated

Securities

490:8-301 Delivery

490:8-302 Rights of purchaser

490:8-303 Protected purchaser

490:8-304 Indorsement

490:8-305 Instruction

490:8-306 Effect of guaranteeing signature,
indorsement, or

instruction

490:8-307 Purchaser's right to requisites for
registration of

transfer

Part 4. Registration

490:8-401 Duty of issuer to register transfer

490:8-402 Assurance that indorsement or
instruction is

effective

490:8-403 Demand that issuer not register transfer

490:8-404 Wrongful registration

490:8-405 Replacement of lost, destroyed, or
wrongfully taken

security certificate

490:8-406 Obligation to notify issuer of lost,
destroyed, or

wrongfully taken security certificate

490:8-407 Authenticating trustee, transfer agent,
and registrar

Part 5. Security Entitlements

490:8-501 Securities account; acquisition of
security

entitlement from securities intermediary

490:8-502 Assertion of adverse claim against
entitlement

holder

490:8-503 Property interest of entitlement holder
in financial

asset held by securities intermediary

490:8-504 Duty of securities intermediary to
maintain

financial asset

490:8-505 Duty of securities intermediary with
respect to

payments and distributions

490:8-506 Duty of securities intermediary to
exercise rights

as directed by entitlement holder

490:8-507 Duty of securities intermediary to
comply with

entitlement order

490:8-508 Duty of securities intermediary to
change

entitlement holder's position to other
form of

security holding

490:8-509 Specification of duties of securities
intermediary

by other statute or regulation; manner
of

performance of duties of securities
intermediary and

exercise of rights of entitlement holder

490:8-510 Rights of purchaser of security
entitlement from

entitlement holder

490:8-511 Priority among security interests and
entitlement

holders

ARTICLE 9.
SECURED TRANSACTIONS

Part 1. General Provisions

Subpart 1. Short Title, Definitions, and
General

Concepts

490:9-101 Short title

490:9-102 Definitions and index of definitions

490:9-103 Purchase-money security interest;
application of

payments; burden of establishing

490:9-104 Control of deposit account

490:9-105 Control of electronic chattel paper

490:9-106 Control of investment property

490:9-107 Control of letter-of-credit right

490:9-108 Sufficiency of description

Subpart 2. Applicability of Article

490:9-109 Scope

490:9-110 Security interests arising under article
2 or 2A

Part 2. Effectiveness of Security
Agreement;

Attachment of Security Interest;
Rights of

Parties to Security Agreement

Subpart 1. Effectiveness and Attachment

490:9-201 General effectiveness of security
agreement

490:9-202 Title to collateral immaterial

490:9-203 Attachment and enforceability of
security interest;

proceeds; supporting obligations;
formal requisites

490:9-204 After-acquired property; future
advances

490:9-205 Use or disposition of collateral
permissible

490:9-206 Security interest arising in purchase
or delivery of

financial asset

Subpart 2. Rights and Duties

490:9-207 Rights and duties of secured party
having possession

or control of collateral

490:9-208 Additional duties of secured party
having control of

collateral

490:9-209 Duties of secured party if account
debtor has been

notified of assignment

490:9-210 Request for accounting; request
regarding list of

collateral or statement of account

Part 3. Perfection and Priority

Subpart 1. Law Governing Perfection and
Priority

490:9-301 Law governing perfection and priority
of

security interests

490:9-302 Law governing perfection and priority
of

agricultural liens

490:9-303 Law governing perfection and priority
of

security interests in goods covered by
a

certificate of title

490:9-304 Law governing perfection and priority
of

security interests in deposit accounts

490:9-305 Law governing perfection and priority
of

security interests in investment
property

490:9-306 Law governing perfection and priority
of

security interests in letter-of-credit
rights

490:9-307 Location of debtor

Subpart 2. Perfection

490:9-308 When security interest or agricultural
lien is

perfected; continuity of perfection

490:9-309 Security interest perfected upon
attachment

490:9-310 When filing required to perfect
security interest or

agricultural lien; security interests
and

agricultural liens to which filing
provisions do not

apply

490:9-311 Perfection of security interests in
property subject

to certain statutes, regulations, and
treaties

490:9-312 Perfection of security interests in
chattel paper,

deposit accounts, documents, goods
covered by

documents, instruments, investment
property, letter-

of-credit rights, and money; perfection
by

permissive filing; temporary perfection
without

filing or transfer of possession

490:9-313 When possession by or delivery to
secured party

perfects security interest without
filing

490:9-314 Perfection by control

490:9-315 Secured party's rights on disposition
of collateral

and in proceeds

490:9-316 Effect of change in governing law

Subpart 3. Priority

490:9-317 Interests that take priority over or
take free of

security interest or agricultural lien

490:9-318 No interest retained in right to
payment that is

sold; rights and title of seller of
account or

chattel paper with respect to creditors
and

purchasers

490:9-319 Rights and title of consignee with
respect to

creditors and purchasers

490:9-320 Buyer of goods

490:9-321 Licensee of general intangible and
lessee of goods

in ordinary course of business

490:9-322 Priorities among conflicting security
interests in

and agricultural liens on same
collateral

490:9-323 Future advances

490:9-324 Priority of purchase-money security
interests

490:9-325 Priority of security interests in
transferred

collateral

490:9-326 Priority of security interests created
by new debtor

490:9-327 Priority of security interests in
deposit account

490:9-328 Priority of security interests in
investment

property

490:9-329 Priority of security interests in
letter-of-credit

right

490:9-330 Priority of purchaser of chattel paper
or instrument

490:9-331 Priority of rights of purchasers of
instruments,

documents, and securities under other
articles;

priority of interests in financial
assets and

security entitlements under article 8

490:9-332 Transfer of money; transfer of funds
from deposit

account

490:9-333 Priority of certain liens arising by
operation of

law

490:9-334 Priority of security interests in
fixtures and crops

490:9-335 Accessions

490:9-336 Commingled goods

490:9-337 Priority of security interests in goods
covered by

certificate of title

490:9-338 Priority of security interest or
agricultural lien

perfected by filed financing statement
providing

certain incorrect information

490:9-339 Priority subject to subordination

Subpart 4. Rights of Bank

490:9-340 Effectiveness of right of recoupment or
set-off

against deposit account

490:9-341 Bank's rights and duties with respect
to deposit

account

490:9-342 Bank's right to refuse to enter into or
disclose

existence of control agreement

Part 4. Rights of Third Parties

490:9-401 Alienability of debtor's rights

490:9-402 Secured party not obligated on contract
of debtor or

in tort

490:9-403 Agreement not to assert defenses
against assignee

490:9-404 Rights acquired by assignee; claims and
defenses

against assignee

409:9-405 Modification of assigned contract

490:9-406 Discharge of account debtor;
notification of

assignment; identification and proof of
assignment;

restrictions on assignment of accounts,
chattel

paper, payment intangibles, and
promissory notes

ineffective

490:9-407 Restrictions on creation or enforcement
of security

interest in leasehold interest or in
lessor's

residual interest

490:9-408 Restrictions on assignment of
promissory notes,

health-care-insurance receivables, and
certain

general intangibles ineffective

490:9-409 Restrictions on assignment of
letter-of-credit

rights ineffective

Part 5. Filing

Subpart 1. Filing Office; Contents and
Effectiveness

of Financing Statement

490:9-501 Filing office

490:9-502 Contents of financing statement; record
of mortgage

as financing statement; time of filing
financing

statement

490:9-503 Name of debtor and secured party

490:9-504 Indication of collateral

490:9-505 Filing and compliance with other
statutes and

treaties for consignments, leases,
other bailments,

and other transactions

490:9-506 Effect of errors or omissions

490:9-507 Effect of certain events on
effectiveness of

financing statement

490:9-508 Effectiveness of financing statement if
new debtor

becomes bound by security agreement

490:9-509 Persons entitled to file a record

490:9-510 Effectiveness of filed record

490:9-511 Secured party of record

490:9-512 Amendment of financing statement

490:9-513 Termination statement

490:9-514 Assignment of powers of secured party
of record

490:9-515 Duration and effectiveness of financing
statement;

effect of lapsed financing statement

490:9-516 What constitutes filing; effectiveness
of filing

490:9-517 Effect of indexing errors

490:9-518 Claim concerning inaccurate or
wrongfully filed

record

Subpart 2. Duties and Operation of
Filing Office

490:9-519 Numbering, maintaining, and indexing
records;

communicating information provided in
records

490:9-520 Acceptance and refusal to accept record

490:9-521 Uniform form of written financing
statement and

amendment

490:9-522 Maintenance and destruction of records

490:9-523 Information from filing office; sale or
license of

records

490:9-524 Delay by filing office

490:9-525 Fees

490:9-526 Filing-office rules

490:9-527 Duty to report

Part 6. Default

Subpart 1. Default and Enforcement of
Security

Interest

490:9-601 Rights after default; judicial
enforcement;

consignor or buyer of accounts, chattel
paper,

payment intangibles, or promissory
notes

490:9-602 Waiver and variance of rights and
duties

490:9-603 Agreement on standards concerning
rights and duties

490:9-604 Procedure if security agreement covers
real property

or fixtures

490:9-605 Unknown debtor or secondary obligor

490:9-606 Time of default for agricultural lien

490:9-607 Collection and enforcement by secured
party

490:9-608 Application of proceeds of collection
or

enforcement; liability for deficiency
and right to

surplus

490:9-609 Secured party's right to take
possession after

default

490:9-610 Disposition of collateral after default

490:9-611 Notification before disposition of
collateral

490:9-612 Timeliness of notification before
disposition of

collateral

490:9-613 Contents and form of notification
before disposition

of collateral: general

490:9-614 Contents and form of notification
before disposition

of collateral: consumer-goods
transaction

490:9-615 Application of proceeds of disposition;
liability

for deficiency and right to surplus

490:9-616 Explanation of calculation of surplus
or deficiency

490:9-617 Rights of transferee of collateral

490:9-618 Rights and duties of certain secondary
obligors

490:9-619 Transfer of record or legal title

490:9-620 Acceptance of collateral in full or
partial

satisfaction of obligation; compulsory
disposition

of collateral

490:9-621 Notification of proposal to accept
collateral

490:9-622 Effect of acceptance of collateral

490:9-623 Right to redeem collateral

490:9-624 Waiver

Subpart 2. Noncompliance with Article

490:9-625 Remedies for secured party's failure to
comply with

article

490:9-626 Action in which deficiency or surplus
is in issue

490:9-627 Determination of whether conduct was
commercially

reasonable

490:9-628 Nonliability and limitation on
liability of secured

party; liability of secondary obligor

Part 7. Transition

490:9-701 Effective date

490:9-702 Savings clause

490:9-703 Security interest perfected before
effective date

490:9-704 Security interest unperfected before
effective date

490:9-705 Effectiveness of action taken before
effective date

490:9-706 When initial financing statement
suffices to

continue effectiveness of financing
statement

490:9-707 Amendment of pre-effective-date
financing statement

490:9-708 Persons entitled to file initial
financing statement

or continuation statement

490:9-709 Priority

Part 8. Transition Provisions for 2010
Amendments

490:9-801 Effective date

490:9-802 Savings clause

490:9-803 Security interest
perfected prior to

July 1, 2013

490:9-804 Security interest
unperfected before

July 1, 2013

490:9-805 Effectiveness of
action taken before

July 1, 2013

490:9-806 When initial financing statement suffices to

continue effectiveness of financing statement

490:9-807 Amendment of
pre-effective-date financing

statement

490:9-808 Person entitled to file initial financing

statement or continuation statement

490:9-809 Priority

ARTICLE 10.
EFFECTIVE DATE AND REPEALER

490:10-101 Effective date

490:10-102 Specific repealer; provision for transition

490:10-103 General repealer

490:10-103.1 Inconsistent laws

490:10-104 Laws not repealed

ARTICLE 11.
EFFECTIVE DATE AND TRANSITION

PROVISIONS--1978
AMENDATORY ACT

490:11-101 Effective date

490:11-102 Preservation of old transition
provision

490:11-103 Transition to new U.C.C.--General Rule

490:11-104 Transition provision on change of
requirement of

filing

490:11-105 Transition provision on change of place
of filing

490:11-106 Required refilings

490:11-107 Transition provisions as to priorities

490:11-108 Presumption that rule of law continues
unchanged

Rules of Court

Applicability of District Court Rules of Civil Procedure, see
DCRCP rule 81(b)(5).

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next